Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.802

Exemption—Solicitation for Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account.

This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of state or a designee from soliciting and accepting contributions to the Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account created in RCW 43.07.380.

[ 2008 c 222 s 14; 2003 c 164 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.